Maryland, session 2025, HB1053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7–409.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1053*

HOUSE BILL 1053
(a) The Administration shall provide to a recipient who receives self–directed
services:
(4) An option for a PARENT, ANOTHER family member, or A legal guardian
of the recipient to provide services for the recipient, if:
(i) The recipient or an individual authorized to make care decisions
on behalf of the recipient chooses the PARENT, family member, OR LEGAL GUARDIAN to
provide the services; and
(ii) The recipient also hires a support broker; AND
(III) THE SERVICES ARE AUTHORIZED TO BE PROVIDED BY THE
PARENT, ANOTHER FAMILY MEMBER, OR THE LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE RECIPIENT
BY AN ADMINISTRATION WAIVER APPROVED BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND
MEDICAID SERVICES;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.